Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 11.
AGRICULTURE AND ANIMALS

Chapter

141 Department of Agriculture

142 Animals, Brands, and Fences

143 Animals: Licenses and Regulations

144 Feed

145 Regulation of Farm Produce

145D Donation of Food

146 Slaughtering Operations and Slaughterhouses

147 Grades and Standards

148 Advertising and Marketing

148D Aquaculture Advisory Council--Repealed

149 Economic Poisons--Repealed

149A Hawaii Pesticides Law

150 Seeds

150A Plant and Non-Domestic Animal Quarantine and
Microorganism

Import

151 Weed Control--Repealed

152 Noxious Weed Control

153 Agricultural Products Program--Repealed

154 Fruit and Nut Orchards--Repealed

155 Agricultural Loans

155D Livestock Revitalization Program

156 Farm Advisory Board--Repealed

157 Milk Control Act

159 Hawaii Meat Inspection Act

161 Poultry Inspection

163 Marketing Orders and Agreements--Repealed

163D Agribusiness Development Corporation

164 Agriculture Coordinating Committee--Repealed

165 Hawaii Right to Farm Act

166 Agricultural Parks

166E Non-Agricultural Park Lands

167 Irrigation Water Development

168 Irrigation and Water Utilization Projects

169 Private Agricultural Parks

CHAPTER
141

DEPARTMENT
OF AGRICULTURE

Section

141-1 Duties in general

141-2 Rules

141-2.5 Aquaculture program

141-2.6 Fees for aquaculture services

141-2.7 Aquaculture development special fund

141-3 Designation of pests; control or
eradication of pests;

emergency power

141-3.5 Control or eradication programs

141-3.6 Entry of private property to control or
eradicate any

pests

141-4 Weights of coffee; rules

141-5 Charges for inspection, etc.

141-6 Appeal from inspector's decision

141-7 General penalty

141-8 Crop damage; civil liability

141-9 Energy feedstock program

141-10 Agricultural development and food security
special

fund; establishment

141-11 Hawaii farm to school program; farm to
school

coordinator

Note

Industrial hemp remediation and biofuel crop research program
of the college of tropical agriculture and human resources at the University of
Hawaii at Manoa; duties of department of agriculture (repealed July 1, 2016).
L 2014, c 56.

Pesticide subsidy program for coffee growers; report to 2019
legislature (repealed June 30, 2019). L 2014, c 105, §3; L 2015, c 152, §1.

Swine farm survey for porcine respiratory and reproductive
syndrome. L 2000, c 207.

Cross References

Agricultural and aquacultural building permit exemptions, see
§46-88.

Hawaii agriculture workforce advisory board, see §371-19.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next